pl: Typ producenta: Rynek wtórny; Oryginał; OEM; Strona trzecia; Inne
nl: Type fabrikant: Aftermarket; Echt; OEM; Externe partij; Andere
hr-HR: Vrsta proizvođača: Aftermarket; Autentičan; OEM; Treća strana; Ostalo
ko: 제조업체 유형: 애프터 마켓; 진품; OEM; 타사; 기타
bg-BG: Тип производител: Следпродажбено обслужване; Истински; OEM; Трета страна; Други
da: Producenttype: Eftermarked; Genuine; OEM; Tredjepart; Andet
zh-CN: 制造商类型: 二级市场; 正品; OEM; 第三方; 其他
el: Τύπος κατασκευαστή: Αγορά μη αυθεντικών ανταλλακτικών και εξαρτημάτων; Γνήσιο; OEM; Τρίτων κατασκευαστών; Άλλο
de: Herstellertyp: Zubehörmarkt; Echt; OEM; Drittpartei; Sonstiges
nb: Produsenttype: Ettermarked; Ekte; OEM; Tredjepart; Annet
hu: Gyártó típusa: Utángyártott; Eredeti; OEM; Harmadik fél; Egyéb
fr: Type de fabricant: Marché secondaire; Authentique; OEM; Tiers; Autre
zh-TW: 製造商類型: 售後市場; 真品; OEM; 第三方; 其他
fi: Valmistajatyyppi: Jälkimarkkinat; Aito; OEM; Kolmannen osapuolen; Muu
ro-RO: Tipul de producător: Aftermarket; Autentic; OEM; Terț; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de fabricante: Mercado pós-venda; Verdadeiro; OEM; Terceiros; Outro
sv: Typ av tillverkare: Eftermarknad; Äkta; OEM; Tredjepart; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta proizvajalca: Poprodajni trg; Pristno; OEM; Tretja oseba; Drugo
ru: Тип производителя: Неоригинальный; Оригинальный; OEM; Стороннего производителя; Другой
pt-BR: Tipo de fabricante: Pós-venda; Genuína; OEM; Terceiro; Outro
ja: メーカーの種類: アフターマーケット; 本物; OEM; 外部; その他
lt-LT: Gamintojo tipas: Antrinė rinka; Autentiškas; Originalių dalių gamintojas; Trečioji šalis; Kita
it: Tipo di produttore: Aftermarket; Genuino; OEM; Di terze parti; Altro
es: Tipo de fabricante: Posventa; Genuino; OEM; Tercero; Otros
cs: Typ výrobce: Aftermarket; Pravé; OEM; Třetí strana; Jiné
th: ประเภทผู้ผลิต: ตลาดหลังการขาย; ของแท้; OEM; บุคคลภายนอก; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ výrobcu: Trh s náhradnými dielmi; Pravý; OEM; Tretia strana; Iné
tr: Üretici türü: Satış sonrası; Eşsiz; OEM; Üçüncü şahıs; Diğer
en: Manufacturer type: Aftermarket; Genuine; OEM; Third-party; Other
vi: Loại nhà sản xuất: Không chính hãng; Chính cống; Nhà sản xuất gốc; Bên thứ ba; Khác